test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuunn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuuʹnn â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     njuuʹnn+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: njuuʹnn
     njuuʹnn+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: njuuʹn
     njuuʹnn+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: njuuʹn
     njuuʹnn+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: njonna
     njuuʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: njuuʹnest
     njuuʹnn+N+Sg+Com+Indef: njuuʹnin
     njuuʹnn+N+Ess+Indef: njuuʹnnen
     njuuʹnn+N+Par+Indef: njuuʹnned
     njuuʹnn+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [njuuʹntaa, njuuʹntää]
     njuuʹnn+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: njuuʹn
     njuuʹnn+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: njuuʹni
     njuuʹnn+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: njuuʹnid
     njuuʹnn+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: njuuʹnid
     njuuʹnn+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: njuuʹnin
     njuuʹnn+N+Pl+Com+Indef: njuuʹnivuiʹm
     njuuʹnn+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [njuuʹnitaa, njuuʹnitää]
